apertium-en-gl/apertium-en-gl.en.metadix
    <pardef n="ag/e__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ed</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ed</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="spoil__vblex">
	    <e c="verbs with two past -t, -ed (-,s,ing,ed/t)">
		    <p>
			    <l/> 
			    <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
		    </p>
	    </e>
	    
	    <e>
		    <p>
			    <l/> 
			    <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
		    </p>
	    </e>
	    
	    <e>
		    <p>
			    <l>s</l> 
			    <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
		    </p>
	    </e>
	    
	    <e>
		    <p>
			    <l>ed</l> 
			    <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
		    </p>
	    </e>
	    
	    <e r="LR" c="chiefly Brit.">
		    <p>
			    <l>t</l> 
			    <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
		    </p>
            </e>
	    
	    <e>
		    <p>
			    <l>ed</l> 
			    <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
		    </p>
	    </e>
	    
	    <e r="LR" c="chiefly Brit.">
		    <p>
			    <l>t</l> 
			    <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
		    </p>
            </e>
	    
	    <e>
		    <p>
			    <l>ing</l> 
			    <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
		    </p>
	    </e>
	    
	    <e>
		    <p>
			    <l>ing</l> 
			    <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
		    </p>
	    </e>
	    
	    <e>
		    <p>
			    <l>ing</l> 
			    <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
		    </p>
	    </e>
	    
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>I</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>you</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>he</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>she</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>it</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>we</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>they</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="probj__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>me</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>you</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>him</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>her</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>it</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>us</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>them</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="probj_dem__prn">
    <e>
        <i/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>me</l> 
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>you</l> 
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>him</l> 
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>her</l> 
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>it</l> 
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>us</l> 
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>them</l> 
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>this</l> 
        <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>these</l> 
        <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>that</l> 
        <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>those</l> 
        <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    
    
      <!-- dialectos -->
      
    <pardef n="o_ou">
      <e c="en_GB, en_CA, en_ZA, en_IE">
	<p>
	  <l>ou</l>
	  <r>ou</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="en_US">
	<p>
	  <l>o</l>
	  <r>ou</r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="z_s">
      <e c="en_GB, en_ZA, en_IE">
	<p>
	  <l>s</l>
	  <r>s</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="en_US, en_CA">
	<p>
	  <l>z</l>
	  <r>s</r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e_ae">
      <e c="en_GB, en_ZA, en_IE, en_CA">
	<p>
	  <l>ae</l>
	  <r>ae</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="en_US">
	<p>
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>ae</r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e_oe">
      <e c="en_GB, en_ZA, en_IE, en_CA">
	<p>
	  <l>oe</l>
	  <r>oe</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="en_US">
	<p>
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>oe</r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="organi/ze__vblex">
      <e c="en_GB, en_ZA, en_IE">
	<p>
	  <l>s</l>
	  <r>s</r>
	</p>
	<par n="liv/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="en_US, en_CA">
	<p>
	  <l>z</l>
	  <r>s</r>
	</p>
      <par n="liv/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

<e lm="anaemia"><i>an</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>mia</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
<e lm="anaesthesia"><i>an</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>sthesia</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
<e lm="reorganisation"><i>reorgani</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ation</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
<e lm="organisation"><i>organi</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ation</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
<e lm="organiser"><i>organi</i><par n="z_s"/><i>er</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
<e lm="organisational"><i>organi</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ational</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
<e lm="age">
        <i>ag</i> 
        <par n="ag/e__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="anaesthetize">
        <i>anaestheti</i> 
        <par n="organi/ze__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="analyze">
        <i>analy</i> 
        <par n="organi/ze__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="blaze away">
	    <i>blaz</i> 
	    <par n="liv/e__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
            <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>  
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>away</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>away</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="bring together">
	    <i>br</i> 
	    <par n="br/ing__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
	    <par n="probj_dem__prn"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>together</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>together</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="calm down">
	    <i>calm</i> 
	    <par n="accept__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
        <par n="probj_dem__prn"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>down</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>down</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="cash in">
	    <i>cash</i> 
	    <par n="approach__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
	    <par n="probj_dem__prn"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>in</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>in</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="drain off">
	    <i>drain</i> 
	    <par n="accept__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
            <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>  
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>off</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>off</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="fade out">
	    <i>fad</i> 
	    <par n="liv/e__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
            <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>out</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>out</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="give up">
        <i>g</i> 
        <par n="g/ive__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
        <par n="probj_dem__prn"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>up</l> 
        <r><g><b/>up</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="give back">
        <i>g</i> 
        <par n="g/ive__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
        <par n="probj_dem__prn"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>back</l> 
        <r><g><b/>back</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="liaise with">
	    <i>liais</i> 
	    <par n="liv/e__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>with</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>with</g></r> 
	    </p>
	    <par n="prsubj__prn"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="line up">
        <i>lin</i> 
        <par n="liv/e__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
        <par n="probj_dem__prn"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>up</l> 
        <r><g><b/>up</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="move along">
	    <i>mov</i> 
	    <par n="liv/e__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
	    <par n="probj_dem__prn"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>along</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>along</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="move away">
	    <i>mov</i> 
	    <par n="liv/e__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
	    <par n="probj_dem__prn"/> 
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>away</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>away</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="optimize">
        <i>optimi</i> 
        <par n="organi/ze__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="organize">
        <i>organi</i> 
        <par n="organi/ze__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="phase in">
	    <i>phas</i> 
	    <par n="liv/e__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
            <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>in</l> 
		    <r><g><b/>in</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="popularize">
        <i>populari</i> 
        <par n="organi/ze__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="pull off">
	    <i>pull</i> 
	    <par n="accept__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
	    <par n="probj_dem__prn"/> 
      <p>
	      <l><b/>off</l> 
	      <r><g><b/>off</g></r> 
	    </p>
    </e>
<e lm="spoil">
	    <i>spoil</i> 
	    <par n="spoil__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="stir up">
        <i>stir</i> 
        <par n="occur__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
        <par n="probj_dem__prn"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>up</l> 
        <r><g><b/>up</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="take for granted">
      <i>t</i> 
      <par n="t/ake__vblex" sa="sep"/> 
      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/> 
      <p>
         <l><b/>for<b/>granted</l>
         <r><g><b/>for<b/>granted</g></r>
      </p>
   </e>
<e lm="get across"><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex" sa="sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>across</l><r><g><b/>across</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="polarize"><i>polari</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
<e lm="amortise"><i>amorti</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
	<e lm="pronoms personals de subjecte"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
<e lm="pronoms personals d'objecte"><i/><par n="probj__prn"/></e>
